Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.250

Use of public funds for political purposes. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

Public funds, whether derived through taxes, fees, penalties, or any other sources, shall not be used to finance political campaigns for state or school district office. A county, city, town, or district that establishes a program to publicly finance local political campaigns may only use funds derived from local sources to fund the program. A local government must submit any proposal for public financing of local political campaigns to voters for their adoption and approval or rejection.

[ 2024 c 164 s 467; 2008 c 29 s 1; 1993 c 2 s 24 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992). Formerly RCW 42.17A.550, 42.17.128.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Short title—1993 c 2: See note following RCW 29B.40.010.